Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 9
HIGH-VISIBILITY DRUNK
DRIVING LAW ENFORCEMENT

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting this part 9, see section 1 of chapter 221, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

43-4-901. High-visibility drunk driving law enforcement.

The department of transportation, in implementing the strategic transportation project investment program, shall, as a priority, increase to twelve episodes annually the number of high-visibility drunk driving law enforcement episodes that the department oversees. The high-visibility drunk driving law enforcement episodes required by this section shall be independent of, and in addition to, the drunk driving prevention and law enforcement program described in part 4 of this article.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 838, § 8, effective September 1.